District of Columbia statutes.
10-207

Meetings.

The Board shall hold stated meetings and such additional meetings as they may from time to time deem necessary. All meetings of the Board shall be open to the public.

History

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 262, ch. 265, art. I, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-207.
1973 Ed., § 8-207.

Editor's Notes

Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.